Illinois, session 104th, HB1603.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Landlord and Tenant Act is amended by 5adding Section 35 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 705/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Restriction on dog breeds.8    (a) In this Section:9        (1) "Dangerous dog" has the same meaning as in the 10    Animal Control Act.11        (2) "Dog" has the same meaning as in the Animal 12    Control Act.13        (3) "Vicious dog" has the same meaning as in the 14    Animal Control Act.15    (b) A landlord or lessor may not refuse to rent to, deny 16housing to, or impose conditions on a lessee or tenant based on 17the breed of a dog or dogs in residential housing that contains 18more than 3 units of housing.19    (c) Nothing in this Section affects the ability of a unit 20of local government to enforce provisions of the Animal 21Control Act regarding a dangerous dog or vicious dog.22    (d) If a lessor or landlord violates the provisions of 23this Section, upon request of the affected lessee or tenant,   HB1603- 2 -LRB104 06364 JRC 16400 b1the Illinois Housing Development Authority must investigate 2the matter. If the Authority finds that a lessor or landlord 3has violated this Section, it must commence an action or 4proceeding in the circuit court of the county in which the 5premises are situated to stop the violation either by mandamus 6or injunction.7    (e) This Section applies to a renewal or modification of 8residential leases that contain more than 3 units of housing 9after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 10General Assembly and to new residential leases entered into 11after that date.